Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 2366.
Law enforcement agencies; fair and impartial policing policy; race data collection.

On or before March 1, 2018, every State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency and every constable who exercises law enforcement authority pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1936a

and who is trained in compliance with section 2358 of this title shall adopt a fair and impartial policing policy that includes each component of the Criminal Justice Council’s model fair and impartial policing policy. Such agencies and constables may include additional restrictions on agency members’ communication and involvement with federal immigration authorities or communications regarding citizenship or immigration status. Agencies and constables may not adopt a policy that allows for greater communication or involvement with federal immigration authorities than is permitted under the model policy.
(a) (1) On or before March 1, 2018, every State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency and every constable who exercises law enforcement authority pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1936a

and who is trained in compliance with section 2358 of this title shall adopt a fair and impartial policing policy that includes each component of the Criminal Justice Council’s model fair and impartial policing policy. Such agencies and constables may include additional restrictions on agency members’ communication and involvement with federal immigration authorities or communications regarding citizenship or immigration status. Agencies and constables may not adopt a policy that allows for greater communication or involvement with federal immigration authorities than is permitted under the model policy.

On or before January 1 of every even-numbered year, the Criminal Justice Council, in consultation with others, including the Attorney General and the Human Rights Commission, shall review and, if necessary, update the model fair and impartial policing policy. If the policy is updated, the Council, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall follow the procedure set forth in subsection (b) of this section and shall have six months after January 1 to complete that procedure.

The Criminal Justice Council, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall review the policies of law enforcement agencies and constables required to adopt a policy pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to ensure those policies comply with subdivision (a)(1) of this section. If the Council, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, finds that a policy does not comply with subdivision (a)(1) of this section, it shall work with the law enforcement agency or constable to bring the policy into compliance. If, after consultation with the Council and the Office of the Attorney General, the law enforcement agency or constable fails to adopt a policy that complies with subdivision (a)(1) of this section on or before July 1, 2019, that agency or constable shall be deemed to have adopted, and shall follow and enforce, the model policy issued by the Council. A finding of compliance with subdivision (a)(1) shall not constitute a finding of compliance with any other applicable law.

Annually, as part of their annual training report to the Council, every State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency and every constable who exercises law enforcement authority pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1936a

and who is trained in compliance with section 2358 of this title shall report to the Council whether the agency or officer has adopted a fair and impartial policing policy in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Criminal Justice Council shall determine, as part of the Council’s annual certification of training requirements, whether current officers have received training on fair and impartial policing as required by subsection 2358(e) of this title.

Annually, on or before July 1, the Criminal Justice Council shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary regarding which departments and officers have adopted a fair and impartial policing policy and whether officers have received training on fair and impartial policing.

On or before September 1, 2014, every State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall collect roadside stop data consisting of the following:
(e) (1) On or before September 1, 2014, every State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall collect roadside stop data consisting of the following:

the age, gender, and race of the driver;

the grounds for the stop;

the grounds for the search and the type of search conducted, if any;

the evidence located, if any;

the outcome of the stop, including whether physical force was employed or threatened during the stop, and if so, the type of force employed and whether the force resulted in bodily injury or death, and whether:

a written warning was issued;

a citation for a civil violation was issued;

a citation or arrest for a misdemeanor or a felony occurred; or

no subsequent action was taken.

Law enforcement agencies shall work with the Executive Director of Racial Equity, the Criminal Justice Council, and a vendor chosen by the Council with the goals of collecting uniform data, adopting uniform storage methods and periods, and ensuring that data can be analyzed. Roadside stop data, as well as reports and analysis of roadside stop data, shall be public.

On or before September 1, 2016 and annually thereafter, law enforcement agencies shall provide the data collected under this subsection to the Executive Director of Racial Equity and the vendor chosen by the Criminal Justice Council under subdivision (2) of this subsection or, in the event the vendor is unable to continue receiving data under this section, to the Council. Law enforcement agencies shall provide the data collected under this subsection in an electronic format specified by the receiving entity.

The data provided pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection shall be posted electronically in a manner that is analyzable and accessible to the public on the receiving agency’s website and clear and understandable. The receiving agency shall also report the data annually to the General Assembly.

As used in this subsection, “physical force” shall refer to the force employed by a law enforcement officer to compel a person’s compliance with the officer’s instructions that constitutes a greater amount of force than handcuffing a compliant person.

Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or impede any public agency from complying with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and 1644. To the extent any State or local law enforcement policy or practice conflicts with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and 1644, that policy or practice is, to the extent of the conflict, abolished.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 17, 2014;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. May 31, 2016;

2017, No. 54

, § 4, eff. May 31, 2017;

2017, No. 54

, § 6, eff. March 1, 2018;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 141;

2019, No. 41

, § 1, eff. May 30, 2019;

2019, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 2367.
Statewide policy; electronic control devices; reporting.

As used in this section:

“Electronic control device” means a device primarily designed to disrupt an individual’s central nervous system by means of deploying electrical energy sufficient to cause uncontrolled muscle contractions and override an individual’s voluntary motor responses.

“Law enforcement officer” means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, Capitol Police officer, State game warden, State Police officer, constable who exercises law enforcement authority pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1936a

and who is trained in compliance with section 2358 of this title, and a certified law enforcement officer employed by a State branch, agency, or department, including the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Agency of Natural Resources, the Office of the Attorney General, the Department of State’s Attorney, the Secretary of State, and the Department of Liquor and Lottery.

On or before January 1, 2015, the Law Enforcement Advisory Board shall establish a statewide policy on the use of and training requirements for the use of electronic control devices. Prior to any use of or intent to use an electronic control device, every State, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency and every constable who is not employed by a law enforcement agency shall adopt this policy. If a law enforcement agency or officer was required to adopt a policy pursuant to this subsection but failed to do so on or before January 1, 2016, that agency or officer shall be deemed to have adopted, and shall follow and enforce, the model policy established by the Law Enforcement Advisory Board. The policy shall include the following provisions:

Electronic control devices are less-lethal, but not necessarily nonlethal, alternatives to lethal force.

Officers may deploy an electronic control device only:

against subjects who are exhibiting active aggression or who are actively resisting in a manner that, in the officer’s judgment, is likely to result in injuries to others or themselves; or

if, without further action or intervention by the officer, injuries to the subject or others will likely occur.

Neither an officer, a subject, or a third party has actually to suffer an injury before an officer is permitted to use an electronic control device, and officers are not required to use alternatives that increase the danger to the public or themselves.

When it is safe to do so, officers shall attempt to de-escalate situations and shall provide a warning prior to deploying an electronic control device.

Electronic control devices shall not be used in a punitive or coercive manner and shall not be used to awaken, escort, or gain compliance from passively resisting subjects. The act of fleeing or of destroying evidence, in and of itself, does not justify the use of an electronic control device.

The use of electronic control devices shall comply with all recommendations by manufacturers for the reduction of risk of injury to subjects, including situations where a subject’s physical susceptibilities are known.

Electronic control devices shall be used in a manner that recognizes the potential additional risks that can result from situations:

involving persons who are in an emotional crisis that may interfere with their ability to understand the consequences of their actions or to follow directions;

involving persons with disabilities whose disability may impact their ability to communicate with an officer, or respond to an officer’s directions; and

involving higher risk populations that may be more susceptible to injury as a result of electronic control devices.

Electronic control devices shall not be used on animals unless necessary to deter vicious or aggressive behavior that threatens the safety of officers or others.

The Criminal Justice Council shall adopt rules and develop training to ensure that the policies and standards of this section are met. The Criminal Justice Council shall ensure that a law enforcement officer receives appropriate and sufficient training before becoming authorized to carry or use an electronic control device.

On or before June 30, 2017, every State, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency that employs one or more certified law enforcement officers shall ensure that all officers have completed the training established in 2004 Acts and Resolves No. 80, Sec. 13(a), and every constable who is not employed by a law enforcement agency shall have completed this training.

The Criminal Justice Council shall coordinate training initiatives with the Department of Mental Health related to law enforcement interventions, training for joint law enforcement and mental health crisis team responses, and enhanced capacity for mental health emergency responses.

Every State, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency and every constable who is not employed by a law enforcement agency shall report all incidents involving the use of an electronic control device to the Criminal Justice Council in a form to be determined by the Council.

The Law Enforcement Advisory Board shall:

study and make recommendations as to whether officers authorized to carry electronic control devices should be required to wear body cameras; and

establish a policy on the calibration and testing of electronic control devices.

, (4)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 10, 2014; amended

2015, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 23, 2016;

2019, No. 73

, § 32.

§ 2368.
Standards for law enforcement use of force.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Chokehold” means the use of any maneuver on a person that employs a lateral vascular neck restraint, carotid restraint, or other action that applies any pressure to the throat, windpipe, or neck in a manner that limits the person’s breathing or blood flow.

“Deadly force” means any use of force that creates a substantial risk of causing death or serious bodily injury.

“Force” means the physical coercion employed by a law enforcement officer to compel a person’s compliance with the officer’s instructions.

“Imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury” means when, based on the totality of the circumstances, a reasonable officer in the same situation would believe that a person has the present ability, opportunity, and apparent intent to immediately cause death or serious bodily injury to the law enforcement officer or another person. An imminent threat is not merely a fear of future harm, no matter how great the fear and no matter how great the likelihood of the harm, but is one that, from appearances, must be immediately addressed and confronted.

“Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in section 2351a of this title.

“Totality of the circumstances” means the conduct and decisions of the law enforcement officer leading up to the use of force and all facts known to the law enforcement officer at the time, including the conduct of the person or persons involved.

Use of force.

Whether the decision by a law enforcement officer to use force was objectively reasonable shall be evaluated from the perspective of a reasonable officer in the same situation, based on the totality of the circumstances. A law enforcement officer’s failure to use feasible and reasonable alternatives to force shall be a consideration for whether its use was objectively reasonable.

A law enforcement officer shall use only the force objectively reasonable, necessary, and proportional to effect an arrest, to prevent escape, or to overcome resistance of a person the officer has reasonable cause to believe has committed a crime or to achieve any other lawful law enforcement objective.

The authority of law enforcement to use physical force is a serious responsibility that shall be exercised judiciously and with respect for human rights and dignity and for the sanctity of every human life. Every person has a right to be free from excessive use of force by officers acting under authority of the State.

The decision by a law enforcement officer to use force shall be evaluated carefully and thoroughly, in a manner that reflects the gravity of that authority and the serious consequences of the use of force by law enforcement officers, in order to ensure that officers use force consistent with law and with agency policies.

When a law enforcement officer knows that a subject’s conduct is the result of a medical condition, mental impairment, developmental disability, physical limitation, language barrier, drug or alcohol impairment, or other factor beyond the subject’s control, the officer shall take that information into account in determining the amount of force appropriate to use on the subject, if any.

A law enforcement officer who makes or attempts to make an arrest need not retreat or desist from his or her efforts by reason of the resistance or threatened resistance of the person being arrested. A law enforcement officer shall not be deemed an aggressor or lose the right to self-defense by the use of proportional force if necessary in compliance with subdivision (2) of this subsection to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance. For the purposes of this subdivision, “retreat” does not mean tactical repositioning or other de-escalation tactics.

A law enforcement officer has a duty to intervene when the officer observes another officer using a chokehold on a person.

Use of deadly force.

A law enforcement officer is justified in using deadly force upon another person only when, based on the totality of the circumstances, such force is objectively reasonable and necessary to:

defend against an imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury to the officer or to another person; or

apprehend a fleeing person for any felony that threatened or resulted in death or serious bodily injury if the officer reasonably believes that the person will cause death or serious bodily injury to another unless immediately apprehended.

The use of deadly force is necessary when, given the totality of the circumstances, an objectively reasonable law enforcement officer in the same situation would conclude that there was no reasonable alternative to the use of deadly force that would prevent death or serious bodily injury to the officer or to another person.

A law enforcement officer shall cease the use of deadly force as soon as the subject is under the officer’s control or no longer poses an imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury to the officer or to another person.

A law enforcement officer shall not use deadly force against a person based on the danger that person poses to himself or herself if an objectively reasonable officer would believe the person does not pose an imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury to the law enforcement officer or to another person.

When feasible, a law enforcement officer shall, prior to the use of force, make reasonable efforts to identify himself or herself as a law enforcement officer and to warn that deadly force may be used.

A law enforcement officer shall not use a chokehold on a person unless deadly force is justified pursuant to subdivisions (1)-(4) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2021;

2021, No. 27

, § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.

§ 2369.
Statewide policy; required use of body camera policy.

On and after January 1, 2022, each law enforcement agency that authorizes its law enforcement officers to use body cameras shall adopt, follow, and enforce a model body camera policy established by the Council, and each law enforcement officer who uses a body camera shall comply with the provisions of that policy.
(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2022, each law enforcement agency that authorizes its law enforcement officers to use body cameras shall adopt, follow, and enforce a model body camera policy established by the Council, and each law enforcement officer who uses a body camera shall comply with the provisions of that policy.

Until the date set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, each law enforcement agency that authorizes its law enforcement officers to use body cameras shall adopt, follow, and enforce the Model Body Worn Camera (BWC) Policy established by the Law Enforcement Advisory Board pursuant to 2016 Acts and Resolves No. 163, and each law enforcement officer who uses a body camera shall comply with the provisions of that policy.

The Council shall incorporate the provisions of this section into training it provides.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.